California statutes. Education Code
(b) The agreement entered into shall be with the lowest responsible bidder who shall give the security that any board requires. The board may reject all bids. For the purpose of securing bids the board shall publish at least once a week for two weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there is no paper, then in some paper of general circulation circulated in the county, a notice calling for bids, stating the proposed terms of the agreement and the time and place where bids will be opened.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 408, Sec. 4.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17407.5.

(a) The governing board of a school district shall not enter into an agreement pursuant to Section 17406 or 17407 with any entity unless the entity provides to the governing board of the school district an enforceable commitment that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(1) The
 governing board of the school district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(2) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the school district prior to January 1, 2017.

(3) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(c) For purposes of this section, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 774, Sec. 2.   (SB 693)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17407.7.

The requirements of Sections 17406, 17407, and 17407.5 shall apply to any agreement entered into by a county board of education, county office of education, or county superintendent of schools to let to any person, firm, or corporation any real property that belongs to the county office of education or a school district and requires the lessee to construct on the demised premises or provide for the construction of a building thereon for use by the county office of education or a school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.   (AB 591)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17408.

The governing board of a school district shall call and hold an election, pursuant to Section 17409 or 17412, before or after entering a lease or agreement, as the case may be, except that if the lease or agreement does not effect an increase in the existing applicable maximum tax rate of the district, the election requirements of this section shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17409.

Before entering into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article, the governing board of the district shall call, hold, and conduct an election in the manner provided in Section 42202, except that the ballot used in the election shall contain substantially the words: “Shall the governing board of the ____ District purchase (a site, sites) prepare plans and specifications, [the reference to the site or sites and plans and specifications shall not be included if, prior to calling the election, the governing board of the district has acquired a site or sites or proposes to lease a site or sites and has prepared plans and specifications] and lease (a site and, sites and) (a building, buildings) to be constructed for use by the school district [designating the location of the site or sites on which the building or buildings will be constructed and generally describing the building or buildings], and, for such purposes, shall the maximum tax rate of the district be increased by not to exceed ____, such increase to be in effect in the ____ District for the years 19_ to __, be authorized and the amount of such increase used solely and exclusively for such purposes?”

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17410.

(a) If, at an election held pursuant to Section 17409, or the predecessor to that section, a majority of the electors voting on the proposition voted “Yes,” the governing board may call an election pursuant to this section.

Before entering into one or more leases or agreements pursuant to this section and this article, the governing board of the district shall call, hold, and conduct an election in the manner provided in Section 42202 of the Education Code, as it existed on December 31, 1979, except that the ballot used in the election shall contain substantially the words: “Shall the governing board of the ____ District purchase (a site, sites) prepare plans and specifications [the reference to the site or sites and plans and specifications shall not be included if, prior to calling the election, the governing board of the district has acquired a site or sites or proposes to lease a site or sites or has prepared plans and specifications] and lease (a site, sites) and (a building, buildings) to be constructed for use by the school district (designating the location of the site or sites on which the building or buildings will be constructed and generally describing the building or buildings) and for those purposes, shall the tax rate increase authorized on [the date of the original election], be used solely and exclusively for those purposes in addition to those approved by the majority of electors at the election held pursuant to Section 17409, or the predecessor to that section, on [the date of the original election]?”

If, at the election held pursuant to this section, a majority of the electors voting on the proposition vote “Yes,” the governing board may proceed pursuant to this article to use that previously authorized tax increase for the purpose or purposes authorized under that election.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to permit the levy of a tax to the extent authorized at an election held pursuant to Section 17409, or the predecessor to that section, as modified to permit the proceeds of that tax to be expended for the purposes authorized at the election held pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17411.

The governing board of the district, if the district proposes at an election held pursuant to Section 17409 to lease more than one building, may include in the ballot measure used in the election a statement that the district reserves the right to lease less than all of the proposed buildings designated in the ballot measure. If such a statement is included in the ballot measure, the governing board may at any time thereafter determine to not lease one or more of the buildings included in the ballot measure, and such determination shall not breach any obligation of the district to the voters of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17412.

An election held pursuant to Section 17409 or Section 17413 shall be held in conjunction with either a statewide primary or general election, or an election date specified in Section 1000 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17413.

In lieu of calling an election pursuant to Section 17409, the governing board of a school district may call an election pursuant to this section. Within 10 days after the governing board has opened the proposals pursuant to Section 17417 or has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 17418 it may accept a proposal, if proceeding under Section 17417, and execute the lease or agreement, and immediately thereafter call an election pursuant to this section.

The governing board of the district shall call, hold, and conduct an election in the manner provided in Section 42202, except that the ballot used in the election shall contain substantially the words: “Shall the governing board of the ____ District lease [a site (sites) and] a building [buildings] to be constructed for use by the school district [designating the location of the site or sites on which the building or buildings will be constructed, and generally describing the building or buildings and the cost thereof], and, for such purposes, shall the maximum tax rate of the district be increased by not to exceed ____, such increase to be in effect in the ____ District for the years 19__ to ____, be authorized and the amount of such increase used solely and exclusively for such purposes?”

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17414.

If, at the election held pursuant to Section 17409 or Section 17413, a majority of the electors voting on the proposition vote “Yes,” the governing board may proceed pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17415.

Whenever the electors of a school district, at an election held pursuant to Section 17409 or 17413, have approved an increase in the maximum tax rate of the district for the purpose of enabling the district to enter into a lease or agreement for a site or building, or both, and before the lease or agreement is entered into, or during the term of the lease or agreement, territory is taken from the district and annexed to or included in another district by any means, the acquiring district shall automatically assume and shall pay to the district from which the territory is transferred a proportionate share of any remaining payments due under the lease or agreement, as the payments become due, for so long as the lease or agreement runs.

The acquiring district’s proportionate share shall be in the ratio which the total assessed valuation of taxable property in the transferred territory bore to the total assessed valuation of taxable property in the whole district from which the territory is transferred for the year immediately preceding the date on which the transfer became effective for all purposes.

This section shall be applicable only with respect to transfers of school district territory which become effective for all purposes after the effective date of enactment of this section, and shall be applicable whether the election under Section 17409 or 17413 occurred prior to or after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17416.

(a) Unless the time allowed for the governing board to enter into the lease agreement is extended pursuant to subdivision (b), if the governing board of the district fails to enter into a lease pursuant to this article within three years after an election, held pursuant to Section 17409, at which a majority of the votes cast favors the proposition submitted, the authorization for an increase in the maximum tax rate shall become void.

(b) If litigation is filed challenging in any way the election held pursuant to Section 17409 or the competitive bidding proceedings or contract for the construction of the building to be used by the district; compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act; or the validity of or the proceedings for the issuance of any bonds, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness of a nonprofit corporation to be sold to finance construction of the building, the authorization for an increase in the maximum tax rate shall not become void because of the failure of the governing board to enter into a lease pursuant to this article until three years after the date upon which this subdivision becomes effective.

This subdivision shall apply only to school districts which had an average daily attendance of 65,000 or more in the 1975–76 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17417.

After the governing board of a school district has complied with Section 17402, it shall, in a regular open meeting, adopt a resolution declaring its intention to enter into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article. The resolution shall describe, in any manner to identify it, the available site upon which the building to be used by the district shall be constructed, shall generally describe the building to be constructed and state that the building shall be constructed pursuant to the plans and specifications adopted by the governing board therefor, shall, if that is the case, state the minimum yearly rental at which the governing board will lease real property belonging to the district upon which the building is to be constructed, and shall state the maximum number of years for which the school district will lease the building or site and building, as the case may be, and shall state that the proposals submitted therefor shall designate the amount of rental, which shall be annual, semiannual, or monthly, to be paid by the school district for the use of the building, or building and site, as the case may be. The resolution shall fix a time, not less than three weeks thereafter for a public meeting of the governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting, at which sealed proposals to enter a lease or agreement with the school district will be received from any person, firm, or corporation, and considered by the governing board. Notice thereof shall be given in the manner provided in Section 17469.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting of the governing body, all sealed proposals which have been received shall, in public session, be opened, examined, and declared by the board. Of the proposals submitted which conform to all terms and conditions specified in the resolution of intention to enter a lease or agreement and which are made by responsible bidders, the proposal which calls for the lowest rental shall be finally accepted, or the board shall reject all bids. The board is not required to accept a proposal, or else reject all bids, on the same day as that in which the proposals are opened.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17418.

(a) As an alternative to obtaining sealed proposals as required by Sections 17407 and 17417, the governing board may, in a public meeting, adopt a resolution declaring its intention to enter into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article with a nonprofit public benefit corporation organized under the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) if the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the nonprofit public benefit corporation provide both of the following:

(1) That no person shall be eligible to serve as a member or director of the corporation except a person initially approved by resolution of the governing board of the school district.

(2) That no part of the net earnings of the corporation shall inure to the benefit of any member, private shareholder, individual, person, firm or corporation excepting only the school district.

(b) The resolution adopted by the governing board shall do all of the following:

(1) Describe, in a manner to identify it, the available site upon which the building to be used by the district shall be constructed.

(2) Generally describe the building to be constructed and state that the building shall be constructed pursuant to the plans and specifications adopted by the governing board therefor.

(3) If that is the case, state the minimum yearly rental at which the governing board will lease real property belonging to the district upon which the building is to be constructed.

(4) State the maximum number of years for which the school district will lease the building, or building and site, as the case may be.

(c) Any building constructed by a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant to a lease or agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be constructed under a contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder pursuant to Article 42 (commencing with Section 20670) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. Section 17424 applies to the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17419.

Any bonds, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness to be issued by a nonprofit corporation to finance the construction of a building pursuant to a lease or agreement entered into pursuant to Section 17418 shall be sold pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 5800) of Division 6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17420.

All bonds, notes, warrants or other evidences of indebtedness referred to in Section 17419 and the interest thereon, and all bonds, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness issued to refinance any bonds, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness referred to in Section 17419 and the interest thereon, are exempt from all taxation in the state other than inheritance, gift and franchise taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17421.

Any building constructed for the use of a school district pursuant to this article is subject to Sections 17280 to 17313, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17422.

For the purposes of Sections 15102 and 15106 and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16000) of Part 10, 50 percent of any remaining payments for use of the building or site and building which would become due from the district under any leases and agreements entered into by the district pursuant to this article, if the leases and agreements were to run their full term, shall be considered outstanding bonded indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17423.

No district shall enter into any lease or agreement pursuant to this article if at the time 50 percent of any remaining rental payments for use of the building or site and building which would become due from the district pursuant to this article, including the lease or agreement to be entered into, if the leases and agreements were to run their full term, plus the total amount of district bonded indebtedness outstanding at the time, shall exceed 7.5 percent for elementary school districts and high school districts and 12.5 percent for unified school districts of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment of the county or counties in which the district is located. For the purpose of this section, the taxable property of the district shall be determined upon the basis that the district’s assessed value has not been reduced by the exemption of the assessed value of business inventories in the district or reduced by the homeowners’ property tax exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17424.

The governing board of the school district shall obtain the general prevailing rate of per diem wages from the Director of the Department of Industrial Relations for each craft, classification or type of workman needed for the construction of the building and shall specify in the resolution and in the notice, required by Section 17417, or in the resolution required by Section 17418 and in the lease or agreement made pursuant to this article, what the general prevailing rate of per diem wages and the general prevailing rate for holiday and overtime work in the locality is for each craft, classification or type of workmen needed for the construction of the building. The holidays upon which such rate shall be paid need not be specified by the governing board, but shall be all holidays recognized in the collective bargaining agreement applicable to the particular craft, classification or type of workmen employed on the project.

Any agreement or lease entered into pursuant to this article shall require that such general prevailing rates will be paid. It shall also require that work performed by any workman employed upon the project in excess of eight hours during any one calendar day shall be permitted only upon compensation for all hours worked in excess of eight hours per day at not less than 112 times the basic rate of pay. There may also be included in leases or agreements entered into pursuant to this article any other requirements with respect to matters related to the subject of this section which the governing board deems necessary or desirable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17425.

The provisions of this article prevail over any provisions of law which conflict therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17426.

All acts and proceedings taken prior to the effective date of the enactment of this section, by or on behalf of any district under this article, or under color of this article, for the authorization of an increase in the maximum tax rate of the district and for the leasing of a building or buildings for the purposes of the district are hereby confirmed, ratified, validated, and declared legally effective. This shall include all acts and proceedings of the governing board of the district and of any person, public officer, board, or agency, heretofore done or taken upon the question of the authorization of the tax rate increase or the leasing. Whenever an election has been called and held prior to the effective date of the enactment of this section, for the purpose of submitting to the voters of any district the question of an increase in the maximum tax rate of the district and for the leasing of a building or buildings for the purposes of the district, the election and all proceedings attendant thereon are hereby confirmed, ratified, validated, and declared to be legally effective for all purposes, and the tax rate increase, if authorized by the required vote and in accordance with the proceedings heretofore taken, shall be a legal and valid authorization, in accordance with its terms, and any tax heretofore or hereafter levied pursuant to that authorization shall be legal and valid. The foregoing provisions of this section shall operate to supply any legislative authorization that may be necessary to validate the acts and proceedings heretofore taken which the Legislature could have supplied or provided for in this article. The foregoing provisions of this section shall be limited to the validation of acts and proceedings to the extent to which the same can be effectuated under the California and United States Constitutions. The foregoing provisions of this section shall not operate to confirm, ratify, validate, or legalize any act, proceeding, or other matter the legality of which is being contested or inquired into in any legal proceeding now pending and undetermined or which may be pending and undetermined during the period of 30 days from and after the effective date of this section, and shall not operate to confirm, ratify, validate, or legalize any act, proceeding, or other matter which has heretofore been determined in any legal proceeding to be illegal, void, or ineffective.

In any school district in which an election was called and held prior to the effective date of this section in which the voters of the district authorized an increase in the maximum tax rate of the district and the leasing of a building or buildings for the purposes of the district, the law in effect at the date of the school district election shall govern the terms of the lease, the terms of the sale of related bonds, notes, and warrants, and the school district’s maximum bonded indebtedness, and Section 17423 shall not be applicable to the school district’s entry into any lease or agreement authorized at an election called and held prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17427.

The State Allocation Board shall consider community school pupils housed in leased facilities that do not conform to the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2-101), Part 3 (commencing with Section 3-089-1), Part 4 (commencing with Section 4-403), and Part 5 (commencing with Section 5-102), of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations as unhoused for the purposes of determining priority for the leasing of portable classrooms pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17428.

The governing board of a school district may lease property in an adjoining school district for garage, warehouse, or other utility purposes or may purchase property in an adjoining school district for those purposes and may dispose of the property in the same manner as property within the boundary of the district is purchased and disposed of.

The power of eminent domain shall not be applicable and the acquisitions by purchase shall be subject to the approval of the governing board of the school district in which the property is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17429.

(a) This section shall apply only to a school district in which the electorate authorizes an increase in the maximum tax rate of the district pursuant to this article for the lease of one or more schools, and there exists at the time of the election on a site owned by the district a school facility not owned by the district meeting all of the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter, which site and school facility are designated and described in the ballot proposition approved by the voters.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a school district may lease from a California nonprofit corporation an existing school and may pay rentals therefor from funds derived from the increase in the maximum tax rate approved by the voters at an election. The purchase price of the school paid by the nonprofit corporation to the owners of the school shall not exceed the actual audited cost of construction thereof including actual interest paid on money borrowed to finance such construction. Prior to the purchase of the school by the nonprofit corporation, an independent certified public accountant shall be retained by the school district to verify the actual cost of construction and any interest paid to finance the construction, and the nonprofit corporation may conclusively rely upon any certificate or opinion setting forth the actual cost of construction and the interest prepared by the independent certified public accountant.

(c) A school district, the electorate of which, prior to the effective date of this section, authorized an increase in the maximum tax rate in the manner, for the purposes, and under the circumstances specified in subdivision (a), may avail itself of the authority afforded by subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Leasing Facilities [17430. - 17447.]

17430.

Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of any school district may enter into a lease or agreement for any school facilities pursuant to this article with a nonprofit corporation organized under Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code if the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the nonprofit corporation provide for both of the following conditions:

(a) No person shall be eligible to serve as a member or director of the nonprofit corporation, except a person initially approved by resolution of the governing board of the school district.

(b) No part of the net earnings of the nonprofit corporation shall inure to the benefit of any member, private shareholder, individual, person, firm, or corporation, excepting only the school district.

Any facilities constructed by a nonprofit corporation pursuant to a lease or agreement entered into pursuant to this article shall be constructed under a contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4220) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17431.

Notwithstanding any other law, an owner’s development lien created pursuant to this article is a covenant for the benefit of the school district or districts expressly described therein which shall, upon recordation with the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located, run with the land described in the document by which the lien is placed of record. The owner’s development lien shall be binding upon successors in interest, during their ownership, of any portion of such land affected thereby and each person having an interest therein derived through any owner of the land owned by the covenantor.

The covenant running with the land created by the owner’s development lien as provided in this section constitutes a valid covenant notwithstanding the fact that it is created in connection with only one estate and is imposed upon a single parcel and is intended to be for the benefit of a school district or districts who are not a landowner or owners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17432.

The sale of bonds for the accomplishment of a school facilities plan shall be subject to the approval of the State Treasurer. Prior to the sale of any bonds, the State Allocation Board shall determine that the proposed facilities to be constructed with the bond proceeds are consistent with its building area and costs standards as to the area and facilities described in the school facilities plan pursuant to which the bonds are to be issued. The sale of the bonds shall be conducted in compliance with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 5800) of Division 6 of Title 1 of the Government Code. However, the bonds may be sold at a negotiated sale. The State Treasurer and the State Allocation Board may impose a charge and collect a fee for reimbursement of actual costs incurred in accomplishing the approval and determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17433.

Any rental payments required by any lease or agreement entered into pursuant to this article may be paid in annual installments or may be prepaid from state funds or other funds of the school district permissible by law to be used for those purposes at any time during the period of the lease or agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17434.

Whenever the governing board determines that a lease or agreement should be entered into with a nonprofit corporation, the board shall adopt a resolution of intention. The board shall have the following powers and shall state in the resolution all of the following:

(a) The intention of the board to formulate a school facilities plan for the school district or a portion thereof.

(b) A summary description of the facilities to be included within the school facilities plan.

(c) The estimated expense of carrying out the school facilities plan, including all incidental expenses.

(d) That a map depicting the exterior boundaries of the territory to be benefited by the school facilities plan is on file with the secretary of the school district and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested.

(e) A legal description of the real property upon which an owner’s development lien is to be imposed and to be recorded with the county recorder of the county or counties in which the real property is located.

(f) The intention of the board to cause the formation of a nonprofit corporation the purpose of which is to issue bonds, notes, or other obligations to finance the construction of the facilities included within the school facilities plan and to lease the facilities to the school district.

(g) That pursuant to Section 17438, an owner’s development lien shall be imposed to the benefit of the school district on all real property described in the map on file with the secretary of the school district, exclusive of real property subject to restrictions that preclude development thereon, which shall specify the amount thereof and the maximum period of time over which the amount is to be paid, together with a specified maximum interest rate.

(h) That the school district may enforce the lien, as to any amount or amounts in default, by judicial foreclosure proceedings as provided for in Section 17444.

(i) That the owner’s development lien provided for in this article shall be imposed with the consent of all owners within the final map of the boundaries in equal amounts on each acre or portion thereof within the territory to be benefited by the school facilities plan or imposed pursuant to Section 17447.

(j) That the proposed facilities may or may not be constructed within the boundaries of the territory to be benefited by the school facilities plan as depicted on the map described in subdivision (d).

(k) That the benefited property may include noncontiguous territory and that real property may subsequently be included by the governing board, subject to the assumption of a pro rata share of all obligations incurred or to be incurred, plus an amount not less than all amounts collected pursuant to the owner’s development lien per acre or portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17435.

Subsequent to the adoption of the resolution pursuant to Section 17434, the secretary of the school district shall mail a copy of such resolution to each owner of property within the territory to be benefited from the school facilities plan as shown on the last equalized assessment roll, as well as the persons that the secretary can reasonably determine may have an interest in the property, except for those persons who have filed written waivers to receive copies of the resolution with the secretary of the district. A copy of the resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. The school district also shall give the notice to any persons who have in writing requested notice of the proceedings. The secretary of the district also shall mail copies of the resolution to any beneficiary under any deeds of trust on property within the territory to be benefited by the school facilities plan unless written waivers to receive the copies have been filed with the secretary of the school district.

Any owner of real property or owner of an interest in real property, such as a trustee or beneficiary under a deed of trust or similar secured interest, may file written objections to the implementation of the school facilities plan with the secretary of the district, which written objections shall be filed with the secretary no later than 30 days from the date of the mailing of a copy of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17436.

No sooner than 30 days from the date mailing occurs pursuant to Section 17435, the governing board of the school district may consider all written objections filed with the secretary of the school district and may, at its discretion, discontinue proceedings pursuant to this article or may adopt, after consideration of written objections, a resolution ordering the implementation of the school facilities plan for the purpose and for the benefit of that territory described in the resolution of intention, provided the owners described in Section 17435 have consented in writing to the owner’s development lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17437.

The resolution ordering implementation of the school facilities plan shall state the following:

(a) A legal description of the real property to which an owner’s development lien is to be imposed.

(b) The names of all owners of record of the real property to which an owner’s development lien is to be imposed.

(c) The total amount of the owner’s development lien to benefit the school district as described in subdivision (g) of Section 17434.

(d) The real property described in the resolution shall be subject to an owner’s development lien for a pro rata share on each acre or portion thereof pursuant to this article or any other amount as herein provided.

(e) That all owners of the real property described in the resolution have agreed on their behalf and on behalf of their successors in interest to pay the designated share of the owner’s development lien, have acknowledged that such agreement constitutes a covenant running with the land pursuant to Section 17431, have agreed that the obligation created is secured by the owner’s development lien as provided in this article, and have consented to the implementation of the owner’s development lien.
